FST/ckt/ckt_adj.foma
#Define Alphabets
define Alphabet [ А | Б | В | Г | Д | Е | Ё | Ж | З | И | Й | К | Ӄ | Л | Ԓ | М | Н | Ӈ | О | П | Р | С | Т | У | Ф | Х | Ц | Ч | Ш | Щ | Ъ | Ы | Ь | Э | Ю | Я
                | а | б | в | г | д | e | ё | ж | з | и | й | к | ӄ | л | ԓ | м | н | ӈ | о | п | р | с | т | у | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ | ъ | ы | ь | э | ю | я | ʼ ];

# Define Vowels
define Vow [ А | Е | Ё | И | О | У | Ы | Э | Ю | Я | %{Æ%}|
             а | е | ё | и | о | у | ы | э | ю | я ];


# Define dominant vowels
define Vd [ А | О | Я | Ё |
            а | о | я | ё ];

# Define recessive vowels
define Vr [ и | у | э | i | u | e ];

# Define Yots 
define Yot [ Е | е | Ё | ё | Ю | ю | Я | я ];

# Define Consonants 
define Cns [ Б | В | Г | Д | Ж | З | Й | К | Ӄ | Л | Ԓ | М | Н | Ӈ | П | Р | С | Т | Ф | Х | Ц | Ч | Ш | Щ |
             б | в | г | д | ж | з | й | к | ӄ | л | ԓ | м | н | ӈ | п | р | с | т | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ ];

# Define Coronals
define Coronal [ т | н | й | ч | р | ԓ |
                 Т | Н | Й | Ч | Р | Ԓ ];

# Define Glottals
define Glottal [ ʼ | Ъ | Ь | ъ | ь ];

# Define Nasals
define Nasal [ М | Н | Ӈ |
               м | н | ӈ ];

# Define Anteriors
define Anterior [ П | Т | С | Ч | М | Н | В |										                         п | т | с | ч | м | н | в ];

# Define Alveolars 
define Alveolar [ Т | Н | Р | С | Ч | Ԓ | Л |
                  т | н | р | с | ч | ԓ | л ];

# Define Bilabials
define Bilabial [ П | М | В |
                  п | м | в ] ;

# Define Backs  
define Back [ К | Ӄ | Ӈ | Г |
              к | ӄ | ӈ | г ];

read lexc ckt_adj.lexc
define Lexicon;

# Define Alternations
define Alternat г -> э || Cns "^" _;

# Define Vowel Elision
define Elision ы н -> 0 || _ "^" э т ы;

define BeginNi ӈ и р э -> ӈ э р а || .#. _;


# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup ["^"|"&"] -> 0;

read lexc ckt_adj.lexc
define Lexicon

 define Grammar Lexicon       .o.
                Alternat      .o.
		Elision       .o. BeginNi .o.
		Cleanup;

 regex Grammar;
